Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. STATE ACCOUNTING, FISCAL MANAGEMENT, AND PRODUCTIVITY

CHAPTER 2113. USE OF APPROPRIATED MONEY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 2113.001. DEFINITIONS. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, in this chapter:

(1) "Appropriated money" means money appropriated by the legislature through the General Appropriations Act or other law.

(2) "State agency" means:

(A) a department, commission, board, office, or other entity in the executive branch of state government;

(B) the supreme court, the court of criminal appeals, another entity in the judicial branch of state government with statewide authority, or a court of appeals; or

(C) a university system or an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, except that a public junior college is excluded from the meaning of the term in all of Subchapter C except Section 2113.101 and all of Subchapter D except Section 2113.205.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 53, eff. June 15, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER B. RESTRICTIONS ON OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

Sec. 2113.011. PUBLICITY. (a) A state agency may not use appropriated money to publicize or direct attention to an individual officer or employee of state government.

(b) A state agency may not use appropriated money to:

(1) maintain a publicity office or department;

(2) employ an individual who has the title or duties of a public relations or press agent; or

(3) pay a public relations agent or business.

(c) Subject to Section 2113.107(d), the executive head of a state agency who considers it necessary or in the public interest may issue through agency channels oral or written information relating to the activities or legal responsibilities of the agency. The information must be issued in the name of the state agency and include the name of the individual authorized to issue the information.

(d) An institution of higher education may operate a news and information service for the benefit of the public if the operation has been authorized and approved by the institution's governing body.

(e) This section does not prohibit the use of appropriated money for publicity functions authorized under Chapter 204, Transportation Code.

(f) This section does not prohibit the Texas State Guard from using appropriated money for the purpose of recruiting or retaining service members, employees, or other personnel. In this subsection, "service member" and "Texas State Guard" have the meanings assigned by Section 437.001.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 11.018, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 339 (S.B. 538), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2023.

Sec. 2113.012. USE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. A state agency may not use appropriated money to compensate an officer or employee who uses alcoholic beverages on active duty.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.013. USE OF MOTOR VEHICLE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an officer or employee of a state agency may not use a state-owned or state-leased motor vehicle except on official state business.

(b) The administrative head of a state agency may authorize an officer or employee to use a state-owned or state-leased motor vehicle to commute to and from work when the administrative head determines that the use may be necessary to ensure that vital agency functions are performed. The name and job title of each individual authorized under this subsection, and the reasons for the authorization, must be included in the report required by Section 2101.0115.

(c) A state agency may not use appropriated money to compensate an individual who violates Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2113.014. EMPLOYEE STANDARDS OF CONDUCT. (a) A state agency may not use appropriated money to compensate a state employee who violates a standard of conduct described by Section 572.051.

(b) A state agency shall provide each state employee it employs a copy of this section and the standards of conduct described by Section 572.051 and require a signed receipt on delivery. A new copy and receipt are required if one of those provisions is changed.

(c) A state agency shall maintain receipts collected from current state employees under this section in a manner accessible for public inspection.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER C. RESTRICTIONS ON GOODS AND SERVICES

Sec. 2113.101. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. A state agency may not use appropriated money to purchase an alcoholic beverage except for authorized law enforcement purposes. A state agency may not use appropriated money to pay or reimburse a travel expense that was incurred for an alcoholic beverage.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.102. AUDITS. (a) A state agency may not use appropriated money to contract with a person to audit the financial records or accounts of the agency except as provided by:

(1) Subsections (b), (c), and (d);

(2) Chapter 466, pertaining to the state lottery;

(3) Chapter 2306, pertaining to the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs; and

(4) Chapter 361, Transportation Code, pertaining to the Texas Turnpike Authority division of the Texas Department of Transportation.

(b) A state agency may use appropriated money to finance a supplemental audit of payments received from the government of the United States if the audit is required as a condition of receipt of the money and an amount for the audit is provided by the federal grant, allocation, aid, or other payment.

(c) A state agency providing grants, loans, or other money to an entity other than a state agency may require, as a condition of receipt of the money, that the recipient have an annual, independent audit performed and submitted to the agency. An agency may require its internal audit staff to make an annual inspection visit to the recipient of the money. After notice of the meeting of the governing body of an agency at which the matter will be included on the agenda, the agency shall take action on any exceptions noted in independent audits received under this subsection and provide documentation of that action to the state auditor, the Legislative Audit Committee, the Legislative Budget Board, and the budget division of the governor's office.

(d) Subsection (a) does not apply to the appointment of an internal auditor under Section 2102.006 or to a contract with the state auditor.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.103. POSTAGE AND POSTAL SERVICES. (a) A state agency should use the most cost-effective means of postal service available. A state agency may use appropriated money to purchase any form of mailing service available from the United States Postal Service that results in lower cost to the agency and affords service comparable in quality to other available postal services. The comptroller shall assist state agencies in determining the types and comparability of postal services available from the United States Postal Service.

(b) Except as provided by Subsections (c) and (d), a state agency may use appropriated money to purchase postage or rent a post office box only from the United States Postal Service.

(c) An agency other than an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, that spends for postage in a fiscal year an amount that exceeds the dollar amount set by the General Appropriations Act as the maximum expenditure for postage shall purchase or rent a postage meter machine and record all purchases of postage on the machine except purchases of postage for employees in field offices and traveling employees. The rental of a postage meter machine by a state agency, including an institution of higher education, the legislature, or an agency in the legislative branch of state government, must be from a company approved by the comptroller. The comptroller by rule shall adopt procedures for the renting entity to pay for postage.

(d) Subsection (b) does not apply to a reimbursement:

(1) to an authorized petty cash account;

(2) to a state employee for an emergency purchase of postage or emergency payment of post office box rent;

(3) that is received by a state agency for authorized services and is appropriated directly to the receiving agency; or

(4) under a contract for mailing services that may include postage, if the contract has been approved by the comptroller.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.68, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 2113.104. MEMBERSHIPS IN AND DUES FOR PROFESSIONAL ORGANIZATIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a state agency may not use appropriated money to pay for membership in or dues for a professional organization unless the administrative head of the agency, or that person's designee, first reviews and approves the expenditure.

(b) This section does not apply to a state library.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.105. INDOOR PLANTS. A state agency may not use appropriated money to purchase, lease, or maintain a live or artificial indoor plant unless the agency is an institution of higher education and the plant is to be used for educational or research purposes.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.106. STATE FACILITIES FOR MEETINGS, CONFERENCES, AND EXAMINATIONS. A state agency shall use state-owned or state-occupied facilities for meetings, conferences, and administration of group examinations and may not use appropriated money to lease private facilities for these purposes unless state facilities are not available when needed, are not adequate to accommodate the meeting, conference, or examination, or are not an economically favorable alternative to other facilities.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.107. PERIODICALS AND OTHER PUBLICATIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a state agency may not use appropriated money to publish a periodical or other publication the cost of which is not reimbursed through revenue attributable to its publication and sale if the publication is:

(1) intended for use by the general public;

(2) generally informational, promotional, or educational; and

(3) not essential to the achievement of a statutory objective of the agency.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to:

(1) Texas Highways magazine;

(2) the Texas Parks and Wildlife magazine;

(3) publications of the Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse;

(4) attorney general opinions, advisories, and decisions;

(5) comptroller opinions, revenue forecasts, and fiscal analyses;

(6) newsletters;

(7) compilations of statutes or rules; or

(8) annual reports and other materials that are required by law and the content of which includes only topics provided by law.

(c) A state agency may not use appropriated money to publish a publication that prominently displays the name or picture of a person holding an office elected statewide or an appointed officer. In this subsection "appointed officer" has the meaning assigned by Section 572.002. This subsection does not apply to the official state travel map published by the Texas Department of Transportation.

(d) A state agency of which the executive head is an elected officer may not use appropriated money to publish a publication relating to the activities or legal responsibilities of the agency within the 120-day period preceding the date of an election at which the office held by the executive head will be filled.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (f), a state agency may not use appropriated money to publish a publication on enamel-coated, cast-coated, or dull-coated printing stock or that contains an average of more than one picture for each two pages of the publication unless the agency imposes a fee for the publication in an amount that recovers the cost of publication.

(f) Subsection (e) does not apply to the publication of a brochure regarding approved foods under the federal special supplemental food program for women, infants, and children administered by the Texas Department of Health, a publication designed to promote tourism or economic development, a publication of the Texas School for the Deaf or the Texas School for the Blind and Visually Impaired, or a publication of an institution of higher education.

(g) A state agency or political subdivision that uses an appropriation to publish a free periodical quarterly or less frequently shall insert annually in an issue of the periodical a notice that anyone wishing to continue receiving the periodical must so request in writing. A state agency or political subdivision that uses an appropriation to publish a free periodical more frequently than quarterly shall insert the notice annually in three consecutive issues of the periodical. The agency or political subdivision shall provide future issues of the periodical only to persons who have requested it.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 1, eff. May 11, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1117, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 614 (H.B. 874), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZED USES OF GOODS AND SERVICES

Sec. 2113.201. EMPLOYEE AWARDS. (a) A state agency may use appropriated money to purchase service awards, safety awards, or other similar awards to be presented to its employees for professional achievement or outstanding service under policies adopted by the agency.

(b) The cost of awards purchased under this section may not exceed $100 for an individual employee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 264 (H.B. 912), Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 2005.

Sec. 2113.202. VOLUNTEER AWARDS. (a) A state agency may use appropriated money to purchase engraved certificates, plaques, pins, or other similar awards to be presented to volunteers for special achievement or outstanding service if the agency has established a volunteer program under Chapter 2109 or other law.

(b) The cost of awards purchased under this section may not exceed $50 for an individual volunteer.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.203. EXAMINATION FEES. A state agency that conducts examinations shall collect all fees charged to the person being examined for each examination, including the cost of a standardized examination instrument, and use appropriated money to pay a provider of goods or services for a cost incurred by the agency providing the examination.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.204. MOVING AND STORAGE EXPENSES OF STATE EMPLOYEES. (a) Except as otherwise authorized by the General Appropriations Act, a state agency may use appropriated money to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in moving the household property only for a state employee who:

(1) is being reassigned from one designated headquarters to another designated headquarters of that agency, if the agency determines that the best interests of the state will be served by the reassignment and the distance between the current and future designated headquarters is at least 25 miles; or

(2) is employed at a facility that is being closed or is undergoing a reduction in force, if the employee accepts a position with the agency at another designated headquarters that is at least 25 miles from the facility being closed or undergoing a reduction in force.

(b) A state agency shall use state-owned equipment for a move authorized by Subsection (a) if it is available to the agency. If state-owned equipment is not available, the agency may pay for the services of a commercial transportation company or for self-service vehicles to make the move.

(c) A state employee is entitled to be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in traveling by personally owned or leased motor vehicle for a move described by Subsection (a) at the rate provided by the General Appropriations Act for business-related travel by a state employee.

(d) A state agency may pay for or reimburse a state employee for storage expenses incurred if the employee is required to live in state-owned housing and the housing is not available when the agency requires the move to be made.

(e) Reimbursement or payment of an expense under this section is conditioned on the submission to the comptroller of receipts or invoices showing the applicable charges.

(f) This section does not authorize payment or reimbursement of a transaction fee or sales commission for the sale of real property.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2113.205. CERTAIN EXPENDITURES INVOLVING MULTIPLE FISCAL YEARS. (a) Except as provided by this subsection, a state agency may use money appropriated for a particular fiscal year to pay expenses related to conducting or attending a seminar or a conference only to the extent it occurs during that year. To the extent that it is cost-effective, a state agency may use money appropriated for a particular fiscal year to pay expenses related to conducting or attending a seminar or conference that will occur partly or entirely during a different fiscal year.

(b) The comptroller may authorize a state agency to use money appropriated for a particular fiscal year to pay the entire cost or amount of a service, including an Internet connection, a periodical subscription, a maintenance contract, a post office box rental, insurance, or a surety or honesty bond, regardless of whether the service is provided over more than one fiscal year.

(c) A state agency may use money appropriated for a particular fiscal year to pay for a utility service provided during that fiscal year and September of the next fiscal year.

(d) The comptroller may establish procedures and adopt rules to administer this section.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(2) "State agency" means:

(A) a department, commission, board, office, or other entity in the executive branch of state government, including an institution of higher education;

(B) the supreme court, the court of criminal appeals, another entity in the judicial branch of state government with statewide authority, or a court of appeals; or

(C) the legislature or another entity in the legislative branch of state government with statewide authority.

(3) "Utility service" means:

(A) the furnishing of electricity, water, or natural gas;

(B) a telecommunications service, a wastewater treatment service, or a waste disposal service; or

(C) any similar commodity or service that the comptroller considers to be a utility service.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1498, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 55, eff. June 15, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER E. RESTRICTIONS ON CAPITAL EXPENDITURES

Sec. 2113.301. PREFERENCE FOR FINANCING CERTAIN CAPITAL EXPENDITURES WITH MONEY GENERATED BY UTILITY COST SAVINGS CONTRACT. (a) In this section:

(1) "State facility purpose" means a purpose related to:

(A) the maintenance of a state-owned or state-leased building or facility; or

(B) a project as defined by Section 2166.001, including a project described by Section 2166.003.

(2) "Utility cost savings contract" means a contract under Subchapter I, Chapter 2166, or other law that guarantees utility cost savings for energy conservation measures to reduce energy or water consumption or to reduce operating costs of governmental facilities.

(b) Before a state agency may use appropriated money to make a capital expenditure for a state facility purpose, the state agency must determine whether the expenditure could be financed with money generated by a utility cost savings contract.

(c) If it is practicable to do so, a state agency that is using appropriated money must finance a capital expenditure for a state facility purpose with money generated by a utility cost savings contract.

(d) If it is not practicable for a state agency that is using appropriated money to finance a capital expenditure for a state facility purpose with money generated by a utility cost savings contract, the state agency must provide justification to the comptroller for the capital expenditure.

(e) In determining under Subsection (b) whether a capital expenditure could be financed by a utility cost savings contract, a state agency must consider whether utility cost savings generated by any department of that agency could be a potential means of financing a capital expenditure for any department of that agency. Money generated by a utility cost savings in one department of a state agency may be used to finance capital expenditures for a state facility purpose in any department of that agency.

(f) This section does not apply to an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(g) This section does not apply to a capital expenditure for a state facility purpose that requires expeditious action to:

(1) prevent a hazard to life, health, safety, welfare, or property; or

(2) avoid undue additional cost to the state.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 553 (S.B. 526), Sec. 3(b) and Ch. 755 (S.B. 1731), Sec. 13(b), eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 5.02, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.69, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 553 (S.B. 526), Sec. 3(b), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 755 (S.B. 1731), Sec. 13(b), eff. September 1, 2017.